District of Columbia statutes.
3-609

Liability of Commission members.

(a)

A member of the Commission shall not knowingly participate in any action of the Commission if such member, or the member’s spouse or domestic partner, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, brother, sister, uncle, aunt, cousin, nephew or niece, has a financial or business interest in the action.

(b)

A member shall not be liable in damages or court costs for any action of the Commission performed in good faith.

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-20, § 10, 23 DCR 1818
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 9(b), 55 DCR 6758
1981 Ed., § 2-609.
1973 Ed., § 2-1239.
D.C. Law 17-231, in subsec. (a), substituted “spouse or domestic partner” for “spouse”.